Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB618.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3103 of Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 3103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subpart and in the declaration and bylaws shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless specifically provided otherwise or unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Detached roof." A roof of a unit that is solely owned by an individual and is not designated as part of the common elements in the governing documents of the association.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 "Solar energy system." Any of the following that have the primary purpose of providing for the collection, storage and distribution of solar or radiant energy received from the sun to generate electricity:(1) A solar collection panel, film, shingle or other solar energy device.(2) A solar structural component fixed in an operating position.* * *"Townhouse unit." A unit designed for a single family:(1) That is constructed with attached walls to another unit on at least one side that extends from the foundation to the roof.(2) That has at least two sides unattached to another building.(3) For which the repair of the roof of the unit is designated as the responsibility of the owner of the unit and not the responsibility of the association.* * *Section 2. Section 3302 of Title 68 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3302. Powers of unit owners' association.* * *(c) Solar energy systems.--Notwithstanding subsection (a), the association may not prohibit or restrict the installation or use of a solar energy system on a detached roof or townhouse unit.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0618PN0629 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728